Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1229
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Employer means the state or any individual, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint-stock company, trust, corporation, political subdivision, or personal representative of the estate of a deceased individual, or the receiver, trustee, or successor thereof, within or without the state, employing any person within the state as an employee;

(2) Employee means any individual permitted to work by an employer pursuant to an employment relationship or who has contracted to sell the goods or services of an employer and to be compensated by commission. Services performed by an individual for an employer shall be deemed to be employment, unless it is shown that (a) such individual has been and will continue to be free from control or direction over the performance of such services, both under his or her contract of service and in fact, (b) such service is either outside the usual course of business for which such service is performed or such service is performed outside of all the places of business of the enterprise for which such service is performed, and (c) such individual is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, profession, or business. This subdivision is not intended to be a codification of the common law and shall be considered complete as written;

(3) Fringe benefits includes sick and vacation leave plans, disability income protection plans, retirement, pension, or profit-sharing plans, health and accident benefit plans, and any other employee benefit plans or benefit programs regardless of whether the employee participates in such plans or programs; and

(4) Wages means compensation for labor or services rendered by an employee, including fringe benefits, when previously agreed to and conditions stipulated have been met by the employee, whether the amount is determined on a time, task, fee, commission, or other basis. Paid leave, other than earned but unused vacation leave, provided as a fringe benefit by the employer shall not be included in the wages due and payable at the time of separation, unless the employer and the employee or the employer and the collective-bargaining representative have specifically agreed otherwise. Unless the employer and employee have specifically agreed otherwise through a contract effective at the commencement of employment or at least ninety days prior to separation, whichever is later, wages includes commissions on all orders delivered and all orders on file with the employer at the time of separation of employment less any orders returned or canceled at the time suit is filed.

Laws 1977, LB 220A, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 1130, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 238, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 311, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 300;

Laws 1999, LB 753, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB255, § 2.

1. Vacation and sick leave

2. Consideration as wages

3. Miscellaneous

1. Vacation and sick leave

The Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act does not prohibit an employer from providing a sick leave benefit which may be used only in the event of illness or injury and which has no monetary value upon termination of employment if it is not so used. Loves v. World Ins. Co., 277 Neb. 359, 773 N.W.2d 348 (2009).

The Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act does not prohibit an employer from providing a sick leave benefit which may be used only in the event of illness or injury and which has no monetary value upon termination of employment if it is not so used. Loves v. World Ins. Co., 276 Neb. 936, 758 N.W.2d 640 (2008).

Under the plain language of subsection (4) of this section, unused sick leave is not a part of wages payable to a separating employee unless there is a specific agreement otherwise. Loves v. World Ins. Co., 276 Neb. 936, 758 N.W.2d 640 (2008).

Accrued vacation time, which is part of an employment agreement, is due and payable as wages upon termination of employment. Roseland v. Strategic Staff Mgmt., 272 Neb. 434, 722 N.W.2d 499 (2006).

2. Consideration as wages

Pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, deferred compensation constitutes wages under the Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act. Sindelar v. Canada Transport, Inc., 246 Neb. 559, 520 N.W.2d 203 (1994).

Where an employment contract provides for the sharing of possible financial losses, sums collected under such a provision are not "benefits" which could be considered "wages" under subsection (3) of this section. Brown v. Clayton Brokerage Co., 238 Neb. 646, 472 N.W.2d 381 (1991).

Where an employment agreement provides for sharing of possible financial losses, sums collected under such a provision are not "benefits" which could be considered "wages" under subsection (3) of this section. Waite v. A. S. Battiato Co., 238 Neb. 151, 469 N.W.2d 766 (1991).

An employee's share of the profits of his employer under a profit-sharing plan can be wages within the meaning of subsection (3) of this section. Suess v. Lee Sapp Leasing, 229 Neb. 755, 428 N.W.2d 899 (1988).

Overtime wages can be claimed under the Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act only if those overtime wages were previously agreed to by the employer and the employee. Nonetheless, even in the absence of a previous agreement concerning overtime compensation, compensation for overtime can be claimed under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act for hours worked in excess of 40 during a given week. Freeman v. Central States Health & Life Co., 2 Neb. App. 803, 515 N.W.2d 131 (1994).

3. Miscellaneous

The Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act does not represent a very clear mandate of public policy which would warrant recognition of an exception to the employment-at-will doctrine. Malone v. American Bus. Info., 262 Neb. 733, 634 N.W.2d 788 (2001).

Statutory definitions applied to facts to reach conclusion that route salesman is an employee within the meaning of the Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act. Rudolf v. Tombstone Pizza Corp., 214 Neb. 276, 333 N.W.2d 673 (1983).

District court erred in finding that plaintiffs were not employees under the definition provided by this section. Tracy v. Tracy, 7 Neb. App. 143, 581 N.W.2d 96 (1998).